Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/et_affix.dat
SFX H   0                    sse                  [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    s                    [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    st                   [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    le                   [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    l                    [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    lt                   [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    ks                   [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    ni                   [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    na                   [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    ta                   [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    ga                   [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    desse                [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    des                  [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    dest                 [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    dele                 [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    del                  [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    delt                 [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    deks                 [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    deni                 [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    dena                 [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    deta                 [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    dega                 [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    de                   [aõ]da
SFX H   0                    sid                  [aõ]da
SFX H   i                    edesse               [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edes                 [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edest                [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edele                [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edel                 [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edelt                [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edeks                [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edeni                [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edena                [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edeta                [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    edega                [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    e                    [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   i                    ede                  [aeiuõä][bdg]i
SFX H   gi                   kke                  [aeiuõä]gi
SFX H   gu                   kku                  [aeiuõä]gu
SFX H   bi                   ppe                  [aeiuõä]bi
SFX H   gi                   esse                 [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   es                   [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   est                  [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   ele                  [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   el                   [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   elt                  [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   eks                  [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   eni                  [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   ena                  [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   eta                  [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   ega                  [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   gi                   e                    [aeiõä]gi
SFX H   ugi                  oesse                ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oes                  ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oest                 ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oele                 ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oel                  ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oelt                 ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oeks                 ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oeni                 ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oena                 ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oeta                 ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oega                 ugi
SFX H   ugi                  oe                   ugi
SFX H   bi                   vesse                [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   ves                  [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   vest                 [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   vele                 [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   vel                  [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   velt                 [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   veks                 [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   veni                 [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   vena                 [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   veta                 [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   vega                 [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   bi                   ve                   [aeiõä]bi
SFX H   ugu                  oosse                ugu
SFX H   ugu                  oos                  ugu
SFX H   ugu                  oost                 ugu
SFX H   ugu                  oole                 ugu
SFX H   ugu                  ool                  ugu
SFX H   ugu                  oolt                 ugu
SFX H   ugu                  ooks                 ugu
SFX H   ugu                  ooni                 ugu
SFX H   ugu                  oona                 ugu
SFX H   ugu                  oota                 ugu
SFX H   ugu                  ooga                 ugu
SFX H   ugu                  oo                   ugu
SFX H   igu                  eosse                igu
SFX H   igu                  eos                  igu
SFX H   igu                  eost                 igu
SFX H   igu                  eole                 igu
SFX H   igu                  eol                  igu
SFX H   igu                  eolt                 igu
SFX H   igu                  eoks                 igu
SFX H   igu                  eoni                 igu
SFX H   igu                  eona                 igu
SFX H   igu                  eota                 igu
SFX H   igu                  eoga                 igu
SFX H   igu                  eo                   igu
SFX H   du                   jusse                [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   jus                  [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   just                 [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   jule                 [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   jul                  [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   jult                 [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   juks                 [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   juni                 [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   juna                 [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   juta                 [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   juga                 [aeõä]du
SFX H   du                   ju                   [aeõä]du
SFX H   idu                  eosse                idu
SFX H   idu                  eos                  idu
SFX H   idu                  eost                 idu
SFX H   idu                  eole                 idu
SFX H   idu                  eol                  idu
SFX H   idu                  eolt                 idu
SFX H   idu                  eoks                 idu
SFX H   idu                  eoni                 idu
SFX H   idu                  eona                 idu
SFX H   idu                  eota                 idu
SFX H   idu                  eoga                 idu
SFX H   idu                  eo                   idu
SFX H   0                    u                    [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udesse               [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udes                 [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udest                [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udele                [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udel                 [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udelt                [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udeks                [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udeni                [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udena                [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udeta                [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    udega                [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    ude                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    usid                 [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   0                    e                    [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü][dgkt]
SFX H   d                    esse                 [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    es                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    est                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    ele                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    el                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    elt                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    eks                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    eni                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    ena                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    eta                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    ega                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    em                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    im                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    u                    [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    usse                 [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    us                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    ust                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    ule                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    ul                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    ult                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    uks                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    uni                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    una                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    uta                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    uga                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   d                    ud                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]d
SFX H   g                    esse                 [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    es                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    est                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    ele                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    el                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    elt                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    eks                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    eni                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    ena                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    eta                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    ega                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    em                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    im                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    u                    [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    usse                 [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    us                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    ust                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    ule                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    ul                   [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    ult                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    uks                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    uni                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    una                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
SFX H   g                    uta                  [aeiortuõäü][hilnrsü]g
